Utah statutes.
75-5-427.   Preservation of estate plan.
In investing the estate, and in selecting assets of the estate for
distribution under Subsections 75-5-425(1) and (2), in utilizing powers of
revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected person,
and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court
should take into account any known estate plan of the protected person,
including his will, any revocable trust of which he is settlor, and any
contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment
or transfer of benefits or interests at his death to another or others which
he may have originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected
person.
